Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1206
Licensee; bond.

Every corporation or association licensed under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 shall, before said license is issued, give a bond to the State of Nebraska in such reasonable sum as the commission shall fix, with a surety or sureties to be approved by the commission, conditioned to faithfully make the payments prescribed by said sections, to keep its books and records and make reports as herein provided, and to conduct its racing in conformity with the provisions of said sections and the rules and regulations prescribed by the commission.

Laws 1935, c. 173, § 6, p. 631;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-1506.